Missouri, session 2026, HB1909.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
D
Section A. Chapter 590, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 590.045, to read as follows:
590.045. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or any regulation to
H
the contrary, the POST commission shall establish a point conversion system for
awarding basic training credit to reserve or active duty members of the Armed Forces
or National GTuard who complete military basic training hours, including advanced
individual training at the United States Army Military Police School.
2. IThe POST commission is hereby authorized to establish a program of
instruction consisting of peace officer training courses for individuals authorized to
W
receive basic training credit under subsection 1 of this section. This program shall
provide sufficient hour and point requirements to qualify such persons to sit for the
Missouri police officer standards and training examination. The program may also seek
to fulfill Department of Defense requirements and reciprocity conditions involving the
transfer of civilian training to military applications.
3. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Military Police Program of
Instruction Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly
or gifted by any person or organization. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the
fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1909 2
the fund shall be used solely for the administration of this section. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the
end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state
treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the
N
fund.
4. The requirements of this section shall apply only if funding to support the
program established under subsection 2 of this sectioWn is appropriated or otherwise
provided.
5. The department of public safety shall promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
A
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if appliRcable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
D
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
H ✔
T
I
W